Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska75-503
Pipeline carriers; tapping pipeline; commission may authorize.

Upon written application of any person who operates or proposes to operate any refinery in this state, after hearing, if in the judgment of the commission the public good shall require, the commission shall enter an order authorizing the tapping of any pipeline at or near any point where the refinery is established or is proposed to be established. In the order, the commission shall provide for the reimbursement of the owner of the pipeline for any expense incident to the tapping thereof for the purposes provided in this section.

Laws 1963, c. 425, art. V, § 3, p. 1417;

Laws 1994, LB 414, § 99.